District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.75

Use of Bond proceeds; funding agreement.

(a)

When a Retail Development Project is certified as a TIF Area by the Mayor pursuant to this subchapter, the proceeds of Bonds issued with respect to the TIF Area shall be used to pay Retail Development Costs and shall be subject to such terms, conditions, and requirements as the Mayor determines to be in the best interests of the District and will further the purposes of this subchapter. The terms, conditions and requirements shall be included in an agreement entered into between the District and the recipient of the proceeds prior to the advance of the proceeds; provided, that, in the Downtown Retail Priority Area, Tax Increment Revenues or any other security authorized by this subchapter shall be used for the payment of debt service on Bonds issued to Bondholders arranged by the recipient of the proceeds of the Bonds prior to the issuance of the Bonds and the proceeds of the Bonds shall be available to the recipient only after the issuance of a certificate of occupancy for the Retail Development Project. In the case of Bonds issued with respect to the Downtown Retail Priority Area, the recipient of the proceeds of the Bonds shall guarantee the Bonds.

(b)

In the case of the Downtown Retail Priority Area, Tax Increment Revenues and the proceeds of Bonds may also be used to pay costs and expenses:

(1)

Incurred in connection with the start-up and administration of a TIF program in the Downtown Retail Priority Area (including feasibility studies, market studies, and legal costs), and marketing the TIF program and the Downtown Retail Priority Area to prospective retailers; provided, that the amount expended pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed $1 million in the aggregate; and

(2)

Of establishing, maintaining, and operating a program to support parking for customers of retail businesses in the Downtown Retail Priority Area and providing streetscape and facade improvements in the Downtown Retail Priority Area; provided, that the amount expended pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed $5 million in the aggregate.

Sept. 8, 2004, D.C. Law 15-185, § 6, 51 DCR 5941